West Virginia, session 2025, HB2302.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Election Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §3-1A-5 of this code, modified by the Election Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on January 3, 2025, relating to the Election Commission (regulation of campaign finance, 146 CSR 03), is authorized.